District of Columbia statutes.
6-301.04

Repealed

District of Columbia Redevelopment Land Agency — Power to acquire and assemble real property; condemnation; utility facilities.

Repealed.

Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 793, ch. 736, § 5
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 587, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 166(b)
Oct. 14, 1972, 86 Stat. 812, Pub. L. 92-495, § 2
Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title II, § 201(d)
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 302, 47 DCR 1091
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39,§ 232(d), 50 DCR 5668
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 303(b), 56 DCR 1117
1981 Ed., § 5-804.
1973 Ed., § 5-704.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 10 of Prevention of Unauthorized Switching of Customer Natural Gas Accounts Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-13, July 10, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 6589).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 232(d) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 232(d) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
Transfer of United States property: Act of September 26, 1978, 92 Stat. 749, Pub. L. 95-385, provided for the transfer of certain United States property to the District of Columbia Redevelopment Land Agency.